Utah statutes.
62A-11-326.   Medical and dental expenses of dependent children.
In any action under this part, the office and the department in their orders:
(1)  shall include a provision assigning responsibility for cash medical
support; and
(2)  shall include a provision requiring the purchase and maintenance of
appropriate medical, hospital, and dental care insurance for those children,
if:
(a)  insurance coverage is or becomes available at a reasonable cost; and
(b)  the insurance coverage is accessible to the children.
